Utah statutes.
41-12a-401.   Means of providing proof of owner's or operator's security.

(1)  Whenever proof of owner's or operator's security is required under this chapter, it may be provided by filing with the department any of the following:

(a)  a certificate of insurance under Section 41-12a-402 or 41-12a-403;

(b)  a copy of a surety bond under Section 41-12a-405;

(c)  a certificate of deposit of money or securities issued by the state treasurer under Section 41-12a-406; or

(d)  a certificate of self-funded coverage under Section 41-12a-407.

(2)  Whenever the term "proof of financial responsibility" is used in this title, it shall be read as "proof of owner's or operator's security."



Amended by Chapter 203, 1991 General Session

